Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3709.01
Tourism industry, defined.

Tourism industry includes any person or other entity, whether for-profit or not-for-profit, that promotes an activity, an event, or a site which attracts both instate and out-of-state visitors, including, but not limited to, a chamber of commerce, a convention and visitors bureau, the hospitality industry, the food and beverage industry, the hotel industry, a passenger transportation provider, any business or organization engaged in recreational, historical, cultural, artistic, or entertainment pursuits, and any person who owns or operates any such activity, event, or site.

Laws 2017, LB222, § 4.